Illinois, session 104th, HB3546.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Potawatomi Land Transfer Task Force Act. 6    Section 2. Purpose. The purpose of the Potawatomi Land 7Transfer Task Force is to ensure the rights of the Illinois 8citizens living on the land transferred to the Prairie Band 9Potawatomi Tribe under Senate Bill 867 of the 103rd General 10Assembly are protected. 11    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:12    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.13    "Director" means the Director of Natural Resources.14    "Task Force" means the Potawatomi Land Transfer Task 15Force. 16    Section 10. Duties; members. 17    (a) The Task Force shall determine the agreements that 18need to be made and the provisions of those agreements that are 19necessary to ensure the continuation of services for the 20Illinois citizens residing on the land that is to become a 21Native American reservation.  HB3546- 2 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    (b) On or before January 1, 2026, the Task Force members 2shall be appointed by the Director as follows:3        (1) A member representing the Prairie Band Potawatomi 4    Tribe;5        (2) A member of the Illinois House of Representatives 6    representing the district which contains this land;7        (3) A member of the Illinois Senate representing the 8    district which contains this land;9        (4) A member representing DeKalb County;10        (5) A member representing Shabbona Township;11        (6) A member representing the Village of Shabbona;12        (7) A member representing a law enforcement in the 13    Village of Shabbona;14        (8) A member representing a fire protection in the 15    Village of Shabbona;16        (9) A member representing emergency medical services 17    in Shabbona Township;18        (10) A member representing the geographically nearest 19    hospital system in DeKalb County;20        (11) A member representing the geographically nearest 21    elementary school in Shabbona Township;22        (12) A member representing the geographically nearest 23    high school in Shabbona Township;24        (13) A member representing the geographically nearest 25    university in DeKalb County;26        (14) A member representing the geographically nearest   HB3546- 3 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    community college in DeKalb County;2        (15) A member representing the public library system 3    in Shabbona Township;4        (16) A member representing a housing authority in 5    DeKalb County;6        (17) A member representing an electric energy company 7    that provides services to DeKalb County;8        (18) A member representing a natural gas company that 9    provides services to DeKalb County;10        (19) A member representing the DeKalb County 11    Department of Public Health;12        (20) A member representing a water and sewage 13    treatment company that provides services to Shabbona 14    Township;15        (21) A member representing a waste management company 16    that provides services to the Village of Shabbona;17        (22) A member representing an environmental authority;18        (23) A member representing a mass transit district in 19    DeKalb County;20        (24) A member representing a street lighting district 21    in DeKalb County;22        (25) A member representing postal services to DeKalb 23    County;24        (26) A member representing a road district in DeKalb 25    County;26        (27) A member representing an airport authority in   HB3546- 4 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    DeKalb County;2        (28) A member representing cemeteries in DeKalb 3    County;4        (29) A member representing a conservation district in 5    DeKalb County;6        (30) A member representing a drainage district in 7    DeKalb County;8        (31) A member representing the DeKalb County 9    Convention and Visitors Bureau;10        (32) A member representing a flood prevention in 11    DeKalb County;12        (33) A member representing a forest preserve district 13    in DeKalb County;14        (34) A member representing the geographically nearest 15    mosquito abatement district in DeKalb County;16        (35) A member representing a multi-township assessment 17    district in DeKalb County;18        (36) A member representing a museum in DeKalb County;19        (37) A member representing the DeKalb County Park 20    District;21        (38) A member representing a planning agency in DeKalb 22    County;23        (39) A member representing a public building 24    commission in DeKalb County;25        (40) A member representing the geographically nearest 26    surface water district in DeKalb County;   HB3546- 5 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    Section 15. Administration. The Department shall provide 2administrative support to the Task Force. 3    Section 20. Report. On or before December 31, 2030, the 4Task Force shall prepare a comprehensive report that 5summarizes its work. The report shall include provisions which 6must be adopted by both the Prairie Band Potawatomi Tribe and 7the State of Illinois in a land management agreement pursuant 8to Section 3b of the State Parks Act. 9    Section 25. Land Transfer Requirement. The land transfer 10specified in Senate Bill 867 shall not be made until the Task 11Force has completed its final report and its recommendations 12are adopted by both the Prairie Band Potawatomi Tribe and the 13Department of Natural Resources in an official land management 14agreement pursuant to Section 3b of the State Parks Act. 15    Section 30. Dissolution. The Task Force shall be dissolved 16upon completion of the land transfer specified under Senate 17Bill 867 of the 103rd General Assembly or if the land transfer 18is rescinded or overturned. 19    Section 35. If and only if Senate Bill 867 of the 103rd 20General Assembly becomes law, then "An Act concerning State 21government" (Senate Bill 867 of the 103rd General Assembly) is   HB3546- 6 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 2    (10300SB0867enr., Sec. 5)3    Sec. 5. Property. In consideration of the lands reserved 4for Chief Shab-eh-nay by the Treaty of Prairie du Chien of July 529, 1829, as well as the Prairie Band Potawatomi Nation's 6historic connection to those lands and the surrounding area, 7the Director of Natural Resources, on behalf of the State of 8Illinois, subject to Section 25 of the Potawatomi Land 9Transfer Task Force Act, is authorized to execute and deliver 10to the Prairie Band Potawatomi Nation, for and in 11consideration of $1 paid to the Department of Natural 12Resources, a quit claim deed to the following described real 13property comprising all of the lands within Shabbona Lake and 14State Park, located in DeKalb County, owned by the State of 15Illinois: 16488-2A17A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 18Conservation by Deed dated November 1, 1972, and recorded 19November 30, 1972, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, 20Illinois, as Document Number 369532, described as follows:21    PARCEL 122    That part of the South Half of Lot 11 in the Northwest 23    Quarter of Section 25, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of 24    the Third Principal Meridian, lying Northwesterly of a   HB3546- 7 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    line parallel with and distant 75 feet Northwesterly, 2    measured at right angles, from the center line of the main 3    track of the Northern Illinois Railway Company (now the 4    Chicago and North Western Transportation Company), as said 5    main track center line was originally located and 6    established over and across said Section 25.7    PARCEL 28    That part of Lot 13 in the Northwest Quarter of Section 25, 9    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 10    Meridian, lying Northwesterly of a line parallel with and 11    distant 75 feet Northwesterly, measured at right angles, 12    from the center line of the main track of the Northern 13    Illinois Railway Company (now the Chicago and North 14    Western Transportation Company), as said main track center 15    line was originally located and established over and 16    across said Section 25.17488-3A18A tract of land described in the Order dated October 26, 1972, 19in the Circuit Court for the 16th Judicial Circuit, DeKalb 20County, Illinois, in Case Number 72 ED 346, vesting title in 21the Department of Conservation of the State of Illinois, said 22portion described as follows:23    That part of the Northwest Quarter of the Southeast 24    Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of 25    the Third Principal Meridian, in DeKalb County, Illinois, 26    lying south of the North line of Lot 47 extended West and   HB3546- 8 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    West of the West line of Lot 47 as shown on the plat 2    recorded in Book "A" of Plats, Page 18. 3488-7,84A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 5Conservation by Deed dated September 22, 1972, and recorded 6May 8, 1973, in the Recorder's office of DeKalb County, 7Illinois, as Document Number 372831, described as follows: 8    The East Half of the East Half of the Northeast Quarter and 9    the East 3 acres of Lot 2 and the East Half of Lots 5, 6 10    and 7 of the southeast Quarter, all in Section 22, 11    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the 3rd P.M. DeKalb 12    County, Illinois; also the following land commencing at 13    the Northeast corner of the southeast Quarter of Section 14    22, Township, Range, county and state aforesaid, thence 15    west 28 rods; thence South 40 rods; thence East 28 rods; 16    thence North 40 rods to the place of beginning; also, 17    Beginning at the Northeast corner of section 22, Township 18    38 North, Range 3 East of the 3rd P.M., thence Westerly 19    along the North line 40 rods to the place of beginning; 20    thence westerly 7 rods; thence Southerly parallel with the 21    East line of said section 13 1/2 rods; thence Easterly 22    parallel to the North line of said Section 7 rods; thence 23    Northerly to the point of beginning, situated in DeKalb 24    County, Illinois.25488-926A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of   HB3546- 9 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1Conservation by Warranty Deed dated June 25, 1971, and 2recorded June 25, 1971, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 3County, Illinois, as Document Number 359311, described as 4follows:5    Part of the East Half (E1/2) of the Northeast Quarter 6    (NE1/4) of Section Twenty-two (22), Township Thirty-eight 7    (38) North, Range Three (3) as follows: Commencing 8    Forty-seven (47) rods west of the Northeast Corner of 9    Section Twenty-two (22); thence west Thirty-three (33) 10    rods: thence south One Hundred Sixty (160) rods; thence 11    east Forty (40) rods; thence north One Hundred Forty-six 12    and one-half (1461/2) rods; thence west Seven (7) rods; 13    thence north thirteen and one-half (131/2) rods to the 14    place of beginning; also15    Lot Four (4), Lot Three (3) and the West Two (2) Acres of 16    Lot Two (2), and the West Half of Lots Five (5), Six (6) 17    and Seven (7) in section Twenty-two (22), Township 18    Thirty-eight (38) North, Range Three (3) East of the Third 19    Principal Meridian as per plat recorded in the Recorder's 20    Office of DeKalb County, Illinois in Book "A" of Plats, 21    Page 17. Situated in the County of DeKalb in the State of 22    Illinois.23488-1024A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 25Conservation by Quit Claim Deed dated September 22, 1972, and 26recorded May 8, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb   HB3546- 10 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1County, Illinois, as Document Number 372832, described as 2follows:3    The West Half of the Northeast Quarter and the Northwest 4    Quarter of the Southeast Quarter, all in Section 22, 5    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 6    Meridian, DeKalb County, Illinois.7488-138A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 9Conservation by Warranty Deed dated April 24, 1970, and 10recorded June 30, 1970, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 11County, Illinois, as Document Number 353862, described as 12follows:13    PARCEL 1: Commencing at a point marking the intersection 14    of the North line of the South Half of the Southwest 15    Quarter of Section 22, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of 16    the Third Principal Meridian, and the center line of the 17    State Aid Route 6 (Shabbona Road, formerly called 18    Earlville Blacktop), running thence Westerly along the 19    North line of the said South Half of the Southwest Quarter 20    of Section 22, a distance of 822.0 feet to a point; running 21    thence Southerly, at an angle of 90 degrees 37 minutes 10 22    seconds measured clockwise from the last described course, 23    and being parallel with the aforesaid center line of State 24    Aid Route 6, a distance of 290.0 feet to a point for a 25    place of beginning; running thence Easterly, parallel with 26    the said North line, 180 feet to a point; running thence   HB3546- 11 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    Southerly, parallel with the aforesaid center line of 2    State Aid Route 6, a distance of 157.0 feet to a point; 3    running thence Northwesterly along a straight line, 237.56 4    feet to the place of beginning. All lying and being in the 5    South Half of the Southwest Quarter of Section 22, 6    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 7    Meridian, in DeKalb County, Illinois. 8    PARCEL 2: Beginning at a point marking the intersection of 9    the North line of the South Half of the Southwest Quarter 10    of Section 22, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third 11    Principal Meridian, and the center line of State Aid Route 12    6 (Shabbona Road, formerly called Earlville Blacktop); 13    running thence Westerly along said North line, 822.0 feet 14    to a point; running thence Southerly at an angle of 90 15    degrees 37 minutes 10 seconds measured clockwise from the 16    last described course and being parallel with the center 17    line of said State Aid Route 6, a distance of 290.0 feet to 18    a point; thence Easterly parallel with the aforesaid North 19    line, 180 feet to a point; running thence Southerly 20    parallel with the aforesaid center line of State Aid Route 21    6, a distance of 157.0 feet to a point; running thence 22    Easterly at an angle of 91 degrees 03 minutes measured 23    clockwise from the last described course, 320.54 feet to a 24    point, 321.5 feet West of the center line of State Aid 25    Route 6; running thence Northerly parallel with said road, 26    407.0 feet to a point which is 50 feet South of the North   HB3546- 12 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    line of the South Half of the Southwest Quarter, being 2    321.5 feet West of said road; running thence Easterly, 3    321.5 feet to the center of said road; running thence 4    North on the center of said road, 50 feet to the place of 5    beginning. All lying and being in the South Half of the 6    Southwest Quarter of Section 22, Township 38 North, Range 7    3 East of the Third Principal Meridian. Situated in the 8    County of DeKalb in the State of Illinois.9488-1410A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 11Conservation by Warranty Deed dated October 20, 1970, and 12recorded February 10, 1971, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 13County, Illinois, as Document Number 357109, described as 14follows:15    Commencing at a point marking the intersection of the 16    North line of the South Half of the Southwest Quarter of 17    Section 22, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third 18    Principal Meridian and the center line of the State Aid 19    Route 6 (Shabbona Road, formerly called Earlville 20    Blacktop); running thence Southerly along the said center 21    line 50.0 feet to a point for a place of beginning; 22    continuing thence Southerly along the center line, along 23    the same course, 407.0 feet to a point; running thence 24    Westerly, at an angle of 90 degrees 37 minutes 10 seconds 25    measured counterclockwise from the last described course, 26    and being parallel with the aforesaid North line, 321.5   HB3546- 13 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    feet to a point; running thence Northerly, parallel with 2    the aforesaid center line of road, 407.0 feet to a point 3    which is 50.0 feet South of the said North line and being 4    321.5 feet West of the place of beginning; running thence 5    Easterly, parallel with the said North line, 321.5 feet to 6    the place of beginning. Lying and being in the South Half 7    of the Southwest Quarter of Section 22, Township 38 North, 8    Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian. Situated in 9    the County of DeKalb in the State of Illinois.10488-1511A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 12Conservation by Warranty Deed dated August 23, 1971, and 13recorded August 24, 1971, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 14County, Illinois, as Document Number 360622, described as 15follows:16    That part of the South Half of the Southeast Quarter of 17    Section 22, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third 18    Principal Meridian, described by beginning at the point of 19    intersection of the North line of said South Half with the 20    center line of Shabbona road; thence South along said 21    center line, 462.0 feet; thence East parallel with said 22    North line, 337.0 feet; thence North parallel with said 23    center line, 462.0 feet to said North line; thence West 24    along said North line 337.0 feet to the point of 25    beginning, in the town of Shabbona. Situated in the County 26    of DeKalb in the State of Illinois.  HB3546- 14 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1488-162A tract of land described in the Order dated August 9, 1973, in 3the Circuit Court for the 16th Judicial Circuit, DeKalb 4County, Illinois, in Case Number 72 ED 171, vesting title in 5the Department of Conservation of the State of Illinois, said 6portion described as follows:7    PARCEL 1: Lots 10 and 16 in the Southeast Quarter of 8    Section 22, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third 9    Principal Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded 10    in Book "A" of Plats, Page 17.11    Also:12    Lots 9, 12, 15, 17, 20, 21, 22, 23, and 24. Also Lots 25, 13    26, 27, 31, 35, and 36. Also Lots 28, 29, and 30 (excepting 14    therefrom the West 286.5 feet of said lots). Lot 32 15    (excepting therefrom the North 36 feet of the West 286.5 16    feet and also excepting therefrom the West 221.5 feet of 17    the South 96 feet of said Lot 32). Also Lots 33, 34, 37, 18    38, and 39 (excepting therefrom the West 221.5 feet of 19    said lots). Also, the West Half of Lots 40 and 41 20    (excepting the West 221.5 feet of said lots). Also, Lot 8 21    (except Sublot 3 of said Lot 8). Also, the South 20 feet of 22    Lot 42 and the South 20 feet of the West 221.5 feet of the 23    West Half of Lot 41. All of said lots being located on the 24    Southeast Quarter of Section 22 and according to plat of 25    record, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, 26    Illinois, in Book "A" of Plats, Page 17, all located in   HB3546- 15 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 2    Meridian, in DeKalb County, Illinois.3488-174A tract of land described in the Order dated January 4, 1973, 5in the Circuit Court for the 16th Judicial Circuit, DeKalb 6County, Illinois, in Case Number 72 ED 171, Parcel 2, vesting 7title in the Department of Conservation of the State of 8Illinois, said portion described as follows:9    Lot 11 in Southeast Quarter of Section 22, Township 38 10    North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in 11    DeKalb County, Illinois.12488-18 13That part of a tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, 14Department of Conservation by Warranty Deed dated June 14, 151971, and recorded June 17, 1971, in the Recorder's Office of 16DeKalb County, Illinois, as Document Number 359138, described 17as follows:18    PARCEL 1:19    Lots 2 and 3 of Lot 62 and all of Lots 63 and 50 in the 20    West Half of the Southwest Quarter of Section 23, Township 21    38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, as 22    per plat thereof recorded in Book "A" of Plats, Page 17.23    PARCEL 2:24    Lot 14 and the East 44 rods of Lot 8 in the East Half of 25    the Southeast Quarter of Section 22, Township 38 North, 26    Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, as per plat   HB3546- 16 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    thereof recorded in Book "A" of Plats, Page 17.2    PARCEL 3:3    Lots 51, 52, 61 and the North Half of Lot 62 in the West 4    Half of the Southwest Quarter of Section 23, Township 38 5    North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, as 6    shown by Plat recorded in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 7    County, Illinois, in Book "A" of Plats, Page 17.8488-199A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 10Conservation by Warranty Deed dated December 17, 1971, and 11recorded December 30, 1971, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 12County, Illinois, as Document Number 362874, in County of 13DeKalb, State of Illinois, described as follows:14    Lots 17, 18, the West Half of Lots 19 and 20, Lots 28, 29, 15    30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, the West Half of Lot 38, 16    Lots 43, 44, 45, 46, 47 and 48, all in Section 23, Township 17    38 North, Range 3, East of the Third Principal Meridian, 18    according to Plat recorded in Book "A" of Plats on pages 17 19    and 19 in the Office of the DeKalb County Recorder, in 20    DeKalb County, Illinois.21488-2022A tract conveyed to the Department of Conservation, State of 23Illinois, by Deed dated September 22, 1972, and recorded May 248, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, Illinois, 25as Document Number 372834, in County of DeKalb, State of 26Illinois, described as follows:  HB3546- 17 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    PARCEL 1:2    Sub Lot 1 of Lot 1, Sub Lot 3 of Lot 1, the South Half of 3    Sub Lot 2 of Lot 1, all of Lots 2 and 15, Sub Lot 2 of Lot 4    16 and the South Half of Sub Lot 1 of Lot 16 in the 5    Subdivision of the Southeast Quarter of the Southeast 6    Quarter of Section 23, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of 7    the 3rd P.M., in DeKalb County, Illinois, according to the 8    plat thereof recorded in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 9    County, Illinois, in Book "A" of Plats, Page 17.10    PARCEL 2:11    Sub Lot 2 of Lot 8 and Sub Lot 2 of Lot 9 of the 12    Subdivision of the Northeast Quarter of the Northeast 13    Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of 14    the 3rd P.M., in DeKalb County, Illinois, according to the 15    plat thereof made by Wheeler Hedges for W. Gates in 1846 16    and filed in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, 17    Illinois, in Book "A" of Plats, page 19.18    PARCEL 3:19    The North Half of Lot 2 of Lot 1 in Section 23, Township 38 20    North, Range 3 East of the 3rd P.M., in DeKalb County, 21    Illinois, in Book "A" of Plats, page 17.22    A tract conveyed to the Department of Conservation, State 23    of Illinois, by Deed dated October 23, 1974, and recorded 24    November 18, 1974, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 25    County, Illinois, as Document Number 383209, in County of 26    DeKalb, State of Illinois, described as follows:  HB3546- 18 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    The Northeast Quarter of Lot 16 in Section 23, also 2    described as the North Half of Lot 1 of Lot 16 in Section 3    23, in Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third 4    Principal Meridian, in DeKalb County, Illinois, according 5    to the plat thereof recorded in the Recorder's Office of 6    DeKalb County, Illinois, in Book "A" of Plats, Page 17.7488-218A tract conveyed to the Department of Conservation, State of 9Illinois by Deed dated September 22, 1972, and recorded May 8, 101973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, Illinois, as 11Document Number 372835, described as follows:12    Commencing at a stone at the Northwest corner of Section 13    25, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the 3rd P.M.: Thence 14    South and along the West Section line of said Section 15    704.2 feet, thence East 271.9 feet, thence South and 16    parallel to the said West Section line, 662.0 feet, thence 17    East to the West right of way line of the Chicago and 18    Northwestern Railroad, thence in a Northeasterly direction 19    along the West right of way of said railroad to a point 20    where said West right of way line and the public road 21    intersect, thence West to the point of beginning, 22    containing in all 25.30 acres, according to plat recorded 23    in the Recorder's Office in Book A of Plats, Page 19, 24    DeKalb County, Illinois. Also, Lot 5 of the Northwest 1/4 25    of Section 25, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the 3rd 26    P.M., according to Plat recorded in the Recorder's Office   HB3546- 19 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    of DeKalb County, Illinois, in Book "A" of Plats, at Page 2    19, situated in the County of DeKalb and the State of 3    Illinois. 4488-225A tract of land described in the Order dated June 6, 1972, in 6the Circuit Court for the 16th Judicial Circuit, DeKalb 7County, Illinois, in Case Number 71 ED 635, vesting title in 8the Department of Conservation of the State of Illinois, said 9portion described as follows:10    Lot 1 of Lot 6 of the East Half of the East Half of Section 11    26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 12    Meridian, situated in DeKalb County, Illinois.13    The West Half of Lot 44 in the Northeast Quarter of the 14    Southwest Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 15    3, East of the Third Principal Meridian, in DeKalb County, 16    Illinois.17    The East Half of Lot 44 in the Northeast Quarter of the 18    Southwest Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 19    3, East of the Third Principal Meridian, situated in 20    DeKalb County, Illinois.21    Lot 32 of a part of the Northeast Quarter of the Southwest 22    Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3, East of 23    the Third Principal Meridian, situated in DeKalb County, 24    Illinois.25    Lot 2 of Lot 4 in the Northeast Quarter of the Southeast 26    Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3, East of   HB3546- 20 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    the Third Principal Meridian, situated in DeKalb County, 2    Illinois, except that part conveyed to Northern Illinois 3    Railway Company by Deed dated April 24th, 1885, recorded 4    May 1st, 1885, in Book 76 of Deeds, Page 40, affecting a 5    200 foot strip of land West of the center track of said 6    Railroad.7    PARCEL 1: Lot 12 (except the Railroad), and that part of 8    the North 1/2 of Lot 11 lying West of the Railroad 9    right-of-way, in the South 1/2 of the Northwest 1/4 of 10    Section 25. Also, Lot 5 (except the Railroad) and all of 11    Lots 7, 10, 12 and 13, Lot 2 of Lot 6, Lot 1 of Lot 8 and 12    the North 2 acres of Lot 14 of Lots on the East 1/2 of the 13    East 1/2 of Section 26, according to the plat made by 14    Wheeler Hedges for W. Gates in 1846; also Lots 7, 8, 9, 12, 15    13, 14, 15, 18 and 20 to 31, both inclusive, and Lots 47 to 16    53, both inclusive and Lot 69 of Lots on the West 1/2 of 17    the East 1/2 of said Section 26, according to the Plat 18    thereof made by Wheeler Hedges for W. Gates in 1846; also 19    Lots 33, 34, 35, 36, 45 and 46 of Lots on the Northeast 1/4 20    of the Southwest 1/4 of said Section 26; also Lots 40, 50 21    and 51, and that part of Lots 38 and 39 lying East of the 22    Highway running North and South through the Northwest 1/4 23    of said Section 26, being Lots on the East 1/2 of the 24    Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26; all in Township 38 25    North, Range 3, East of the Third Principal Meridian, 26    situated in DeKalb County, Illinois.  HB3546- 21 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    PARCEL 2: The North 10 acres of the West 1/2 of the 2    Northeast 1/4, Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3, 3    East of the Third Principal Meridian, situated in DeKalb 4    County, Illinois.5    PARCEL 3: Lot 19 in the North 1/2 of the West 1/2 of the 6    East 1/2 of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3, East of 7    the Third Principal Meridian, situated in DeKalb County, 8    Illinois.9488-23, 25, 26, and 27 10A tract of land described in the Order dated December 20, 1972, 11in the Circuit Court for the 16th Judicial Circuit, DeKalb 12County, Illinois, in Case Number 72 ED 241, vesting title in 13the Department of Conservation of the State of Illinois, said 14portion described as follows:15    PARCEL 2316    Lot 1 of Lot 9 of Subdivision in the East Half of the East 17    Half of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the 18    Third Principal Meridian, in DeKalb County, Illinois.19    PARCEL 2520    Lot 11 of the East Half of the East Half of Section 26, 21    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 22    Meridian, situated in the County of DeKalb, Illinois.23    PARCEL 2624    Lot 10 in the West Half of the East Half of Section 26, 25    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 26    Meridian, situated in DeKalb County, Illinois.  HB3546- 22 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    PARCEL 272    Lot 11 in the West Half of the East Half of Section 26, 3    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 4    Meridian, situated in DeKalb County, Illinois.5488-246A tract conveyed to the Department of Conservation, State of 7Illinois, by Deed dated September 22, 1972, and recorded May 88, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, Illinois, 9as Document Number 372836, in County of DeKalb, State of 10Illinois, described as follows:11    Lot 1 of Lot 6 of the East Half of the East Half of Section 12    26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 13    Meridian. (DeKalb County, Illinois)14488-2915A portion of a tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, 16Department of Conservation by Warranty Deed dated June 19, 171971, and recorded August 2, 1971, in the Recorder's Office of 18DeKalb County, Illinois, as Document Number 360075, in County 19of DeKalb, State of Illinois, said portion described as 20follows:21    A part of the Southwest Quarter of Section 23, Township 38 22    North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 23    described as follows:24    Lot 49 and Lot 64 (said Lot 64 consisting of Sublots 1, 2, 25    3, and 4) as shown on plat of said Section 23 recorded in 26    Book "A" of Plats, Page 17 in the DeKalb County Recorder's   HB3546- 23 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    Office, DeKalb County, Illinois.2    ALSO: Part of the Northwest Quarter of Section 26, 3    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 4    Meridian, described as follows:5    Lots 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 47, 48, 49, 52, 53, 62, 63, 64, 65 6    and that part of Lot 60 Lying Northerly and Westerly of Lot 7    "B" of Plat of "Gates Farm" (said Plat of Gates Farm being 8    recorded in Book "D" of Plats, Page 81 in the DeKalb County 9    Recorder's Office); said Lots being in accordance with the 10    survey plat of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East 11    of the Third Principal Meridian, as recorded in Book "A" 12    of Plats, Pages 18 and 19 in the DeKalb County Recorder's 13    Office, situated in the County of DeKalb, in the State of 14    Illinois.15488-3016A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 17Conservation by Warranty Deed dated June 16, 1971, and 18recorded February 18, 1972, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 19County, Illinois, as Document Number 363804, described as 20follows:21    Commencing 74 2/3rds rods South of a stake witnessed by an 22    iron wood 8 inches in diameter bearing 19 links South, 23    being the Northwest corner of Section 26, Township 38 24    North, Range 3, East of the Third Principal Meridian, and 25    6 chains and 5 links East thereof, thence East 30 rods; 26    thence South 17 2/3rds rods; thence West 41 rods; thence   HB3546- 24 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    North 11 2/3rds rods, thence East 11 rods; thence North 6 2    rods to the place of beginning, excepting therefrom the 3    East 2 acres heretofore conveyed, Quit-Claim Deed recorded 4    July 27th, 1933, in Book 134 of DEEDS, Page 498.5    Situated in the County of DeKalb in the State of Illinois.6488-317A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 8Conservation by Warranty Deed dated May 31, 1972, and recorded 9May 31, 1972, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, 10Illinois, as Document Number 365633, described as follows:11    Parcel 1: Lots 3 and 4 of the Northeast Quarter of Section 12    27, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 13    Meridian and also Lot 67 of the Northwest Quarter of 14    Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third 15    Principal Meridian, also starting at the Southeast corner 16    of said Lot 3 in said Section 27 as shown on the Plat filed 17    in Book "A" of Plats, Page 18 and running thence South 18    along the Section line 206 feet to a point; running thence 19    West parallel with the South boundary of said Lot 3 to the 20    West boundary of the East Half of the East Half of said 21    Section 27; running thence North along the West boundary 22    of said East half of the East Half of said Section 27 to 23    the Southwest corner of said Lot 3; running thence East 24    along the South boundary of said Lot 3 to the place of 25    beginning; also starting at the Southwest corner of said 26    Lot 3 and running thence South along the West boundary of   HB3546- 25 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    the East Half of the East Half of Section 27, 206 feet to a 2    place of beginning; running thence South along the West 3    boundary of the East Half of the East Half of said Section 4    27, 85 feet more or less to the right of way of State Aid 5    Route No. 6; thence East parallel with the South boundary 6    of said Lot 3, 32 feet; thence North parallel with the West 7    boundary of the East Half of the East Half of Section 27, 8    85 feet; thence West parallel with the South boundary of 9    said Lot 3, 32 feet to the place of beginning, all situated 10    in DeKalb County, Illinois.11    Parcel 2:12    That part of the South Half of the Southwest Quarter of the 13    Northeast Quarter of Section 27, Township 38 North, Range 14    3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, lying North and 15    East of County Highway No. 6, as shown on the plat of said 16    highway dated May, 1943, in DeKalb County, Illinois.17    Situated in the County of DeKalb in the State of Illinois.18488-3219A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 20Conservation by Quit-Claim Deed dated September 22, 1972, and 21recorded May 8, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 22County, Illinois, as Document Number 372837, described as 23follows:24    The NW 1/4 of the NE 1/4 and the N 1/2 of the SW 1/4 of the 25    NE 1/4 of Section 27; Also, Lots 1 and 2 of the NE 1/4 of 26    the NE 1/4 of Section 27, as shown on Plat Book "A", Page   HB3546- 26 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    18; Also, Lots 13, 18 and 19 and the E 1/2 of Lots 40 and 2    41 of the SE 1/4 of Section 22, as shown on Plat Book "A", 3    Page 17; All situated in Township 38 North, Range 3 East of 4    the 3rd P.M. 5    Situated in the County of DeKalb in the State of Illinois.6488-337A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 8Conservation by Quit-Claim Deed dated September 22, 1972, and 9recorded May 8, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 10County, Illinois, as Document Number 372838, described as 11follows:12    Parcel 1 The West 286.5 feet of Lots 28, 29 and 30; also, 13    the West 286.5 feet of the North 36 feet of Lot 32; also, 14    the West 221.5 feet of the South 96 feet of Lot 32; also, 15    the West 221.5 feet of Lots 33 and 34; also, the West 221.5 16    feet of Lots 37, 38, 39, 40 and 41; also, Lot 42; all of 17    the foregoing being in the Southeast Quarter of Section 18    22, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 19    Meridian, according to the Plat thereof recorded in Plat 20    Book "A", Page 17. EXCEPT that part of the South Half of 21    the Southeast Quarter of Section 22, Township 38 North, 22    Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, described by 23    beginning at the point of intersection of the North line 24    of said South Half with the center line of Shabbona Road; 25    thence South along said center line, 462.0 feet; thence 26    East parallel with said North line, 337.0 feet; thence   HB3546- 27 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    North parallel with said center line 462.0 feet to said 2    North line; thence West along said North line 337.0 feet 3    to the point of beginning. 4    Parcel 2 The East Half of the Southeast Quarter of the 5    Southwest Quarter of Section 22, Township 38 North, Range 6    3 East of the Third Principal Meridian. EXCEPT that part 7    of the above described land conveyed to the State of 8    Illinois, Department of Conservation by Richard I. Selah 9    and recorded as Document No. 357109 on February 10, 1971, 10    and Duane G. Houghtby and recorded as Document No. 353862 11    on June 30, 1970. 12    Parcel 3 The East Half of the Northeast Quarter of the 13    Northwest Quarter of Section 27, Township 38 North, Range 14    3 East of the Third Principal Meridian. EXCEPT the South 15    198 feet thereof, in the County of DeKalb, Illinois.16    All situated in the County of DeKalb in the State of 17    Illinois.18488-3419A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 20Conservation by Quit-Claim Deed dated September 22, 1972, and 21recorded May 8, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 22County, Illinois, as Document Number 372839, described as 23follows:24    The East Half of the East Half of Section 27, Township 38 25    North Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 26    EXCEPTING Therefrom Lots 1, 2, 3 and 4 of said Section 27,   HB3546- 28 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    as shown on the plat filed in Book "A" of Plats, Page 18; 2    ALSO EXCEPTING therefrom the following described property: 3    Beginning at the Southeast corner of said Lot 3 in said 4    Section 27, as shown on the Plat filed in Book "A" of 5    Plats, page 18, and running thence South along the Section 6    line, 206 feet to a point; running thence West parallel 7    with the South Boundary of said Lot 3 to the West boundary 8    of the East Half of the East Half of said Section 27; 9    running thence North along the West boundary of said East 10    Half of the East Half of said Section 27 to the Southwest 11    corner of said Lot 3; running thence East along the South 12    boundary of said Lot 3 to the place of beginning; also 13    starting at the Southwest corner of said Lot 3 and running 14    thence South along the West boundary of the East Half of 15    the East Half of Section 27, 206 feet to the place of 16    beginning; running thence South along the West boundary of 17    the East Half of the East Half of said Section 27, 85 feet, 18    more or less, to the right of way of State Aid Route No. 6; 19    thence East parallel with the South boundary of said Lot 20    3, 32 feet; thence North parallel with the West boundary 21    of the East Half of the East Half of Section 27, 85 feet; 22    thence West parallel with the South boundary of said Lot 23    3, 32 feet to the place of beginning, all situated in 24    DeKalb County, Illinois.25488-3526A portion of a tract conveyed to the State of Illinois,   HB3546- 29 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1Department of Conservation by Warranty Deed dated June 19, 21971, and recorded August 2, 1971, in the Recorder's Office of 3DeKalb County, Illinois, as Document Number 360075, in County 4of DeKalb, State of Illinois, said portion described as 5follows:6    Lot 6 of William Marks Plat in the Southeast Quarter of 7    Sect ion 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third 8    Principal Meridian; also a part of Lot 5 of William Marks 9    Plat in the West Half of the Southeast Quarter of Section 10    26, Township and Range aforesaid, described as follows: 11    Commencing at a point 153 feet North of the Southeast 12    corner of Lot 6 of William Marks Plat in said Quarter 13    Section and running thence North 177 feet; thence East 145 14    feet; thence South 210 feet; thence West 55 feet; thence 15    North 33 feet; thence West 90 feet to the place of 16    beginning; also the West Half of the Southwest Quarter of 17    Section 26; also commencing at the center of the South 18    line of the Southwest Quarter of Said Section 26 and 19    running thence East on the Section line 12 chains and 31 20    links to the schoolhouse lot; thence North 2 chains and 25 21    links; thence East 2 chains; thence North 17 chains and 66 22    links; thence West 14 chains and 31 links; thence South 19 23    chains and 96 links to the place of beginning; also 24    commencing on the South line of said Section 26, 5 chains 25    and 25 links West of the Southeast corner of the Southwest 26    Quarter, and running thence North 9 rods; thence West 9   HB3546- 30 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    rods; thence South 9 rods; thence East 9 rods to the place 2    of beginning, excepting therefrom the East 21 feet; also 3    known as Lot 14, except the East 21 feet, of Edmonds Plat; 4    also Lots 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 14, 39 and 40 of the 5    Northeast Quarter of the Southwest Quarter of said Section 6    26; also Lots 58, 59 and 68 of the Northwest Quarter of 7    said Section 26; also: Commencing 60 rods South of the 8    Northwest corner of said Section 26, running thence South 9    60 rods; thence East 15 1/2 rods; thence North 28 rods; 10    thence West 1 1/2 rods; thence North 32 rods; thence West 11    14 rods to the place of beginning; Also: Commencing at the 12    Southwest corner of the Northwest Quarter of said Section 13    26, running thence North 41 rods and 5 links; thence East 14    15 rods and 23 links; thence South 32 rods and 5 links; 15    thence East 16 rods; thence South 9 rods; thence West 31 16    rods and 23 links to the place of beginning; also: 17    Commencing at the Southeast corner of Lot 58 on the 18    Northwest Quarter of Section 26 aforesaid; running thence 19    South 20 rods thence West 16 rods; thence North 20 rods; 20    thence East to the place of beginning; All in Township of 21    Shabbona, DeKalb County, Illinois, except the Southerly 22    130 feet of Lot 6 which lies North of the right of way line 23    of the public highway. Lots "A" and "B" of Section 26 in 24    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 25    Meridian, according to surveyor's plat thereof recorded in 26    the office of the Recorder of said DeKalb County, in Plat   HB3546- 31 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    Book "B" at page 92; also all those parts or portions of 2    land conveyed to the Northern Illinois Railway Company 3    (now Chicago and North Western Railway Company) by Elding 4    Eldingson and wife by deed dated April 25, 1885, and 5    recorded in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, 6    Illinois in Book 76 of Deeds, page 53, and of the land 7    conveyed to said Railway Company by James Cameron and wife 8    by deed dated April 29, 1885, and recorded in said 9    Recorder's Office in Book 76 of Deeds, Page 60, and of the 10    land conveyed to said railway Company by Henry L. Green 11    and wife by deed dated April 28, 1885, and recorded in said 12    Recorder's Office in Book 76 of Deeds, Page 44, lying and 13    being Easterly of a line running parallel with and distant 14    125 feet Easterly of the center line of the main track of 15    said Chicago and North Western Railway Company, and also 16    those parts or portions of the land so conveyed by the said 17    James Cameron and wife to said Railway Company, aforesaid, 18    and of the land conveyed to said Railway Company by 19    Charles H. Card and wife by deed dated September 13, 1885, 20    and recorded in said Recorder's Office, in Book 76 of 21    Deeds, Page 331, lying and being Westerly of a line 22    parallel with and distant 125 feet Westerly from said 23    center line of main track; all situated in the County of 24    DeKalb and State of Illinois.25    Lot 6 of William Marks Plat in the Southeast Quarter of 26    Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third   HB3546- 32 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    Principal Meridian; also a part of Lot 5 of William Marks 2    Plat in the West Half of the Southeast Quarter of Section 3    26, Township and Range aforesaid, described as follows: 4    Commencing at a point 153 feet North of the Southeast 5    corner of Lot 6 of William Marks Plat in said Quarter 6    Section and running thence North 177 feet; thence East 145 7    feet; thence South 210 feet; thence West 55 feet; thence 8    North 33 feet; Thence West 90 feet to the place of 9    beginning; All in Township of Shabbona, DeKalb County, 10    Illinois, except the Southerly 130 feet of Lot 6 which 11    lies North of the right of way line of the public highway.12    That part of Lot A in the East Half of Section 26 and Lot B 13    of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third 14    Principal Meridian, according to a surveyor's plat thereof 15    recorded in the Office of the Recorder of DeKalb County, 16    in Plat Book B at Page 92; also all those portions of Land 17    conveyed to the Northern Illinois Railway Company (Chicago 18    and Northwestern Railway Company) by Elding Eldingson and 19    his wife by deed dated April 25, 1885, and recorded in the 20    Office of the Recorder of DeKalb County, Illinois, in Book 21    76, Page 53 and of the land conveyed to said Railway 22    Company by James Cameron and wife by deed dated April 29, 23    1885 and recorded in said Recorder's Office in Book 76 of 24    Deeds, Page 60, and of the land conveyed to said Railway 25    Company by Henry L. Green and his wife by deed dated April 26    28, 1885 and recorded in said Recorder's Office in Book 76   HB3546- 33 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    of Deeds, Page 44, lying and being Easterly of a line 2    running parallel with and distant 125 feet Easterly of the 3    center of the main track of said Chicago and Northwestern 4    Railway Company, and also those parts or portions of the 5    land so conveyed by James Cameron and wife to said Railway 6    Company, aforesaid, and of the land conveyed to said 7    Railway Company by Charles H. Card by deed dated September 8    13, 1885, and recorded in said Recorder's Office in Book 9    76 of Deeds, Page 331, lying and being Westerly of a line 10    parallel with and distant 125 feet Westerly from said 11    center line of main track; all situated in the County of 12    DeKalb and State of Illinois.13488-3614A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 15Conservation by Quit-Claim Deed dated September 22, 1972, and 16recorded May 8, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 17County, Illinois, as Document Number 372842, described as 18follows:19    The West Half of Lot 44 in the Northeast Quarter of the 20    Southwest Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 21    3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in DeKalb County, 22    Illinois.23488-3724A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 25Conservation by Quit-Claim Deed dated September 22, 1972, and 26recorded May 8, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb   HB3546- 34 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1County, Illinois, as Document Number 372843, described as 2follows:3    The East Half of Lot 44 in the Northeast Quarter of the 4    Southwest Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 5    3 East of the 3rd P.M., situated in DeKalb County, 6    Illinois.7488-388A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 9Conservation by Warranty Deed dated September 3, 1971, and 10recorded September 3, 1971, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 11County, Illinois, as Document Number 360860, described as 12follows:13    Lot 32 of a part of the Northeast Quarter of the Southwest 14    Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of 15    the Third Principal Meridian, situated in DeKalb County, 16    Illinois. 17488-3918A tract conveyed to the Department of Conservation, State of 19Illinois, by Deed dated September 22, 1972, and recorded May 208, 1973, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, Illinois, 21as Document Number 372844, in County of DeKalb, State of 22Illinois, described as follows:23    Lot 2 of Lot 4 in the Northeast Quarter of the Southeast 24    Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 East of 25    the Third Principal Meridian, situated in DeKalb County, 26    Illinois, EXCEPT that part conveyed to Northern Illinois   HB3546- 35 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    Railway Company by Deed dated April 24, 1885, recorded May 2    1, 1885, in Book 76 of Deeds, Page 40 affecting a 200 foot 3    strip of land West of the center track of said Railroad.4488-405A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 6Conservation by Warranty Deed dated June 27, 1972, and 7recorded June 27, 1972, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 8County, Illinois, as Document Number 366267, described as 9follows:10    Lots "A" and "B" of Gates Farm Plat, a subdivision of part 11    of the Northwest Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, 12    Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian in Plat Book 13    "D", Page 81, recorded in the Recorder's Office on April 14    21st, 1922, situated in DeKalb County, Illinois. ALSO, 15    Lots 37, 38, 41, 42, and 43, all in the Northeast Quarter 16    of Southwest Quarter of Section 26, Township 38 North, 17    Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian, according to 18    the plat thereof recorded in Plat Book "A" of Plats, Page 19    15, situated in DeKalb County, Illinois. ALSO: The East 20    Half of a tract of land described as follows: Commencing 21    74 2/3rds rods South of a Stake witnessed by an iron wood 8 22    inches in diameter bearing 19 links South, being the 23    Northwest corner of Section 26, Township 38 North, Range 3 24    East of the Third Principal Meridian, and 6 chains and 5 25    links East thereof, thence East 30 rods, thence South 17 26    2/3rds rods; thence West 41 rods; thence North 11 2/3rds   HB3546- 36 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    rods; thence East 11 rods; thence North 6 rods to the place 2    of beginning, situated in DeKalb County, Illinois.3488-414A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 5Conservation by Warranty Deed dated February 17, 1975, and 6recorded February 27, 1975, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb 7County, Illinois, as Document Number 384530, described as 8follows:9    Parcel 1: Those parts of Lots 3, 4, 14 and 15, situated in 10    the East Half of the Southeast Quarter of Section 26, 11    Township 38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal 12    Meridian, bounded and described as follows, to wit: 13    Beginning at the point of intersection of a line drawn 14    parallel with and 75 feet Northwesterly measured at right 15    angles from the center line of the main track of Chicago 16    and North Western Transportation Company, a corporation of 17    Delaware, with the center line of Big Indian Creek; thence 18    Northeasterly parallel with the center line of said main 19    track to a point in the North line of the East Half of the 20    Southeast Quarter, said North line also being the North 21    line of Lot 4; thence West along said North line of Lot 4 22    to the Northwest corner of the East Half of Lot 4; thence 23    Southerly along the West line of said East Half of Lot 4 to 24    a point in a line drawn parallel with and 200 feet 25    Northwesterly measured at right angles from the center 26    line of the main track; thence Southwesterly along said   HB3546- 37 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    line drawn parallel with the center line of the main track 2    to the South line of Lot 4; thence East along the South 3    line of Lot 4 to a point 125 feet Northwesterly measured at 4    right angles from the center line of the main track; 5    thence Southwesterly parallel with said center line of the 6    main track to the center line of Big Indian Creek; thence 7    Easterly along the center line of Big Indian Creek to the 8    point of beginning.9    Parcel 2: That part of Lot 15 which lies South of the 10    center line of Big Indian Creek and that part of Lot 16 11    which lies North of the South 20 rods of said Lot 16; lying 12    between two parallel lines distant, respectively, 61 feet 13    and 125 feet Northwesterly at right angles from the center 14    line of the main track of the Chicago and North Western 15    Railway Company; said Lots being located in the Southeast 16    Quarter of the Southeast Quarter of Section 26, Township 17    38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian.18    Situated in the County of DeKalb in the State of Illinois.19488-4220A tract conveyed to the State of Illinois, Department of 21Conservation by Warranty Deed dated July 6, 1979, and recorded 22August 22, 1979, in the Recorder's Office of DeKalb County, 23Illinois, as Document Number 423251, described as follows:24    That part of the West Half of Lot 4 of the Northeast 25    Quarter of the Southeast Quarter of Section 26, Township 26    38 North, Range 3 East of the Third Principal Meridian,   HB3546- 38 -LRB104 11334 BDA 21421 b1    according to the plat thereof recorded in Book "A" of 2    Plats, Page 19, that lies East of the East line of Lot 2 of 3    Lot 4 and Northerly of a line 200 feet Northwesterly of and 4    parallel to the center line of the main track of the 5    Chicago and North Western Railway Company, a corporation 6    of Wisconsin.7    Situated in the County of DeKalb in the State of Illinois.8(Source: 10300SB0867enr.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law, except that Section 35 takes effect upon 11becoming law or on the date Senate Bill 867 of the 103rd 12General Assembly takes effect, whichever is later.